Hawaii statutes.
§414D-323 Saving provisions. (a)
Except as provided in subsection (b), the repeal of a statute by this chapter
does not affect:

(1) The operation of the statute or any action taken
under it before its repeal;

(2) Any ratification, right, remedy, privilege,
obligation, or liability acquired, accrued, or incurred under the statute
before its repeal;

(3) Any violation of the statute or any penalty,
forfeiture, or punishment incurred because of the violation, before its repeal;

(4) Any proceeding, reorganization, or dissolution
commenced under the statute before its repeal, and the proceeding,
reorganization, or dissolution may be completed in accordance with the statute
as if it had not been repealed; or

(5) Any meeting of members or directors or action by
written consent noticed or any action taken before its repeal as a result of a
meeting of members or directors or action by written consent.

(b) If a penalty or punishment imposed for
violation of a statute repealed by this chapter is reduced by this chapter, the
penalty or punishment if not already imposed shall be imposed in accordance
with this chapter.

(c) Nothing in this chapter shall affect the
validity of any action taken by any corporation, or shall impair or affect the
validity of any provision of the articles of incorporation or bylaws adopted by
any corporation, prior to July 1, 2002. [L 2001, c
105, pt of §1; am L 2002, c 130, §72]

Revision Note

"July 1, 2002"
substituted for "the effective date of this chapter".

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next